District of Columbia statutes.
32-1364

Exemptions.

(a)

Nothing set forth in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting an employer or employment agency from publishing, in print, on the Internet, or in any other medium, an advertisement for any job vacancy that contains any provision setting forth any other qualifications for a job, as permitted by law, including:

(1)

The holding of a current and valid professional or occupational license;

(2)

A certificate, registration, permit, or other credential; or

(3)

A minimum level of education, training, or professional, occupational, or field experience.

(b)

Nothing in this chapter is intended to preclude an employer or employment agency from examining the reasons underlying an individual’s status as unemployed in assessing an individual’s ability to perform a job or in otherwise making employment decisions about that individual.

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting an employer or employment agency from publishing, in print, on the Internet, or in any other medium, an advertisement for any job vacancy that contains any provision stating that only applicants who are currently employed by the employer will be considered for employment.

History

May 31, 2012, D.C. Law 19-132, § 5, 59 DCR 2391